Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.061

Warrants—Department of enterprise services—Printing—Retention of redeemed warrants.

The department of enterprise services is responsible for the printing of all state treasury warrants for distribution as directed by the state treasurer. All warrants redeemed by the state treasurer shall be retained for a period of one year, following their redemption, after which they may be destroyed without regard to the requirements imposed for their destruction by chapter 40.14 RCW.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 43 s 305; 1993 c 38 s 1; 1981 c 10 s 1; 1975 c 48 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Purpose—2011 1st sp.s. c 43: See notes following RCW 43.19.003.

Actions against state on redeemed warrants, time limitation: RCW 4.92.200.